California, session 20252026, SB401.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 91013.1 is added to the Government Code, to read:91013.1. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may extend any filing deadline established by this title title, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), for individuals that live in an area impacted by an emergency situation. situation if the emergency situation is reasonably likely to affect the individual’s ability to timely file.(b) A filing extension granted by the commission shall not exceed 60 days from the original filing deadline.(c) This section does not authorize the commission to extend the filing deadline for a campaign statement or report during the 90 days before an election. (b)(d) For purposes of this section, “emergency situation” means an emergency proclaimed by the Governor or a local governing body pursuant to Section 8625 or Section 8630 of the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2).SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.